Massachusetts, session 194th, S2875.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 11 of chapter 89 General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking, in line 17, the figure “$200” and inserting in place thereof the
following:- “$250 for a first offense, and by a fine of not more than $500 for a second or
subsequent offense”.
of 1